Wisconsin, session 2025, SB513.
do enact as follows:SB513,13Section 1. 6.31 of the statutes is created to read:SB513,2,246.31 Information provided to certain high school students. Each 5school board, as defined in s. 115.001 (7), shall ensure that all of the following are 1provided to each high school student in the school board’s school district who 2becomes eligible to register to vote:SB513,2,43(1) A voter registration form prescribed under s. 6.33 and information 4concerning eligibility to vote.SB513,2,65(2) Nonpartisan materials describing the role of the citizen and the 6importance of voting in elections.SB513,2,77